Hawaii statutes.
§383-144 Unlawful disclosures. If any individual,
whether an employee or member of the department of labor and industrial
relations, or the referee, in violation of section 383-95, makes any disclosure
of information obtained from any employing unit or individual in the
administration of this chapter, or if any individual who has obtained any list
of applicants for work, or of claimants or recipients of benefits, under this
chapter, uses or permits the use of the list for any political purpose, that individual
shall be fined not less than $20 nor more than $200, or imprisoned not more
than ninety days, or both. [L 1939, c 219, §14(a); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of
subs 36; RL 1945, §4291; RL 1955, §93-143; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS
§383-144; am L 2016, c 55, §9]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next